Arkansas, session 2025, SB212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 7, Chapter 4, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 4 — Document Validity Division

7-4-401. Document Validity Division.
(a) There is created within the office of the Secretary of State the
Document Validity Division.
(b) The Secretary of State may designate members of his or her staff
as record validity investigators, who shall investigate documents and
activities related to the validity and truthfulness of records submitted to
the office of the Secretary of State under Arkansas Code, Title 7, Chapters 5
or 9.
(c) The Document Validity Division shall be a law enforcement agency
of the office of the Secretary of State appointed by the Secretary of State
from his or her employees to investigate the validity of documents filed with
the Secretary of State under Arkansas Code, Title 7, Chapters 5 or 9.

*SSS083*
02-26-2025 10:05:09 SSS083

As Engrossed: S2/20/25 S2/26/25 SB212
7-4-402. Investigations.
(a) The Secretary of State or a document validity investigator may
conduct an investigation to determine whether a document submitted to the
Secretary of State under Arkansas Code, Title 7, Chapters 5 or 9, is false or
fraudulent.
(b) An investigation under this subchapter may include without
limitation:
(1) Administering oaths;
(2) Issuing subpoenas;
(3) Compelling witness attendance;
(4) Collecting evidence; and
(5) Requiring the production of any books, papers,
correspondence, memorandum, agreements, or other documents or records that
are relevant or material to the inquiry.
(c) If an individual fails to comply with a subpoena request issued by
the Secretary of State or a document validity investigator under subsection
(b) of this section, the Secretary of State may request an order from a court
of appropriate jurisdiction to enforce the subpoena.
(d) A document determined by the division to contain fraud or falsity
by a preponderance of the evidence shall be declared null and void for any
legal purpose overseen by the Secretary of State.
(e) The division may refer any findings of fraud or falsity under this
subchapter to the Attorney General's office for further investigation and
action.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act
are declared to be severable and the invalidity of any provision of this act
shall not affect other provisions of the act which can be given effect
without the invalid provision.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and
determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the process
for citizens to propose initiated acts and amendments to the Arkansas
Constitution is critical to a well-functioning democracy in this state; that
it is of the utmost importance that the integrity of the initiative process
be strengthened through this act so that petitioners and voters maintain a
02-26-2025 10:05:09 SSS083

As Engrossed: S2/20/25 S2/26/25 SB212
high degree of confidence in the soundness of their right to legislate as
citizens of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary because any
delay in the implementation of this act would disrupt the initiative process
for the 2026 general election, which would have a detrimental effect on the
public peace, health, and safety of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/K. Hammer




















02-26-2025 10:05:09 SSS083